Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.100

Renewal of credentials.

The secretary shall establish administrative procedures, administrative requirements, continuing education, and fees for renewal of credentials as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. When establishing continuing education requirements for agency affiliated counselors, the secretary shall consult with the appropriate state agency director responsible for licensing, certifying, or operating the relevant agency practice setting.

[ 2008 c 135 s 10; 1996 c 191 s 5; 1991 c 3 s 25; 1987 c 512 s 10.]